Nebraska, session 109, LB686.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB686 LB686
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Ammunition means ammunition or cartridge cases, primers,
bullets, or propellant powder designed for use in any firearm;
(b) Assign or assignment refers to a covered entity's policy,
process, or practice that labels, links, or otherwise associates a
merchant category code with a merchant or payment card transaction in a
manner that allows the covered entity or any other entity facilitating or
processing the payment card transaction to identify whether a merchant is
a firearm retailer or whether a transaction involves the sale of firearms
or ammunition;
(c) Covered entity means an entity or agent of an entity that
establishes a relationship with a retailer for the purpose of processing
credit, debit, or prepaid transactions;
(d) Firearm includes firearm components and accessories;
(e) Firearm retailer means any person or entity that is engaged in
the lawful selling or trading of firearms or ammunition;
(f) Merchant category code means the code, approved by the
International Organization for Standardization, that is assigned to a
retailer based on the type of goods and services offered to a retailer's
customers;
(g) Payment card means a credit card, charge card, debit card, or
any other card that is issued to an authorized card user and that allows
the user to obtain, purchase, or receive goods, services, money, or
anything else of value from a merchant;
(h) Payment card network means an entity or agent of an entity that
provides the proprietary services, infrastructure, and software to
conduct payment card transaction authorizations, clearances, and
settlements; and
(i) Payment card transaction means any transaction in which a
payment card is accepted as payment.
(2)(a) No government entity, official, or agent or employee of a
-2-

LB686 LB686
2025 2025
government entity or official shall knowingly keep or cause to be kept
any list, record, or registry of privately owned firearms or the owners
of firearms, except for those records kept during the regular course of a
criminal investigation, prosecution, or as otherwise required by law.
(b) A payment card network shall not require or incentivize the use
of a merchant category code in a manner that distinguishes a firearm
retailer from other retailers.
(c) A covered entity shall not assign a firearm retailer a merchant
category code that distinguishes the firearm retailer from other
retailers.
(3)(a) The Attorney General shall investigate reasonable allegations
that a person or entity, including a government entity, has violated
subsection (2) of this section. Upon finding a violation, the Attorney
General shall issue a written notice to the person or entity believed to
have committed the violation. The person or entity shall cease the
violation within thirty business days after receiving such written
notice.
(b) If such person or entity does not cease the violation within
thirty business days after receiving such written notice, then the
Attorney General shall file an action against such person or entity to
seek an injunction.
(c) If the court finds that a person or entity violated the
provisions of this section and has not ceased the violation, then the
court shall enjoin such person or entity from continuing the violation.
(d) If such person or entity fails to comply with such injunction
after thirty business days of being served the injunction, then the
Attorney General shall seek to impose on that person or entity a civil
fine in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars per violation. In
assessing the amount of the fine, the court shall consider the financial
resources of the violator and the harm or risk of harm to the right to
keep and bear arms under Article I, section 1, of the Constitution of
-3-

LB686 LB686
2025 2025
Nebraska.
(e) Any order imposing a civil fine pursuant to this section shall
be stayed pending an appeal of the order.
(4) The Attorney General has exclusive authority to enforce the
provisions of this section. The remedies set forth in this section are
the exclusive remedies for any violation of this section.
(5) It shall be a defense to a proceeding initiated pursuant to this
section that a merchant category code was required to be permitted or
assigned by law.
-4-